Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 72.
CITY AND COUNTY LIBRARY AMENDMENT (CONST. AMENDS. 30 AND 38, §§ 1 AND 3, AMENDED, CONST. AMENDS. 30 AND 38, § 5, ADDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const. Amend. 30, §§ 1, and 3, added Ark. Const. Amend. 30, § 5, amended Ark. Const. Amend. 38, §§ 1, and 3, and added Ark. Const. Amend. 38, § 5. The amendments to those sections are incorporated within those sections. The amendment was proposed by H.J.R. 1006 during the 1991 Regular Session and adopted at the 1992 general election by a vote of 471,325 for and 325,160 against.